Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 32.1-1.
References to former sections, articles and chapters of Title 32 and other titles.

Whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 32 or any other title of this Code as such titles existed prior to October 1, 1979, are transferred in the same or in modified form to a new section, article or chapter of this title or any other title of this Code and whenever any such former section, article or chapter is given a new number in this or any other title, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 32 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions or contents or portions thereof.

History.

1979, c. 711.

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1974, the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to study Title 32, Health, of the Code and to report its findings in the form of a recodification of that title. In December of 1978, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing a proposed revision of Title 32 and also drafts of several companion bills which would accomplish additional changes sought by the State Department of Health. This report contains revisor’s notes and other explanatory matter which, while valuable, are too lengthy for inclusion here. The proposed revision of Title 32 was adopted by the 1979 General Assembly as chapter 711 of the Acts of 1979. Effective October 1, 1979, it repealed Title 32 and enacted in lieu thereof a new Title 32.1. It also repealed certain provisions of

Titles 54

and 62.1 and incorporated substantially similar provisions in the new Title 32.1. The companion acts to Acts 1979, c. 711, repealed designated provisions of Title 32 and enacted substantially similar provisions in titles other than new Title 32.1. In addition to its revision by Chapter 711, former Title 32 was also amended by other acts passed at the 1979 session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated these amendments into new Title 32.1, or into corresponding sections of other titles enacted by companion acts to Chapter 711. In addition, an amendment to § 54-524.109:18, which section was repealed by Chapter 711, has been incorporated in the corresponding new section, § 32.1-88.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 32.

Acts 1979, c. 711, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations of the State Board of Health and those of the Virginia Voluntary Formulary Board in effect on the effective date of this act [Oct. 1, 1979], shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

§ 32.1-2.
Finding and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that the protection, improvement and preservation of the public health and of the environment are essential to the general welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth. For this reason, the State Board of Health and the State Health Commissioner, assisted by the State Department of Health, shall administer and provide a comprehensive program of preventive, curative, restorative and environmental health services, educate the citizenry in health and environmental matters, develop and implement health resource plans, collect and preserve vital records and health statistics, assist in research, and abate hazards and nuisances to the health and to the environment, both emergency and otherwise, thereby improving the quality of life in the Commonwealth.

This comprehensive program of preventive, curative, restorative, and environmental health services shall include prevention and education activities focused on women’s health, including, but not limited to, osteoporosis, breast cancer, and other conditions unique to or more prevalent among women.

History.

1979, c. 711; 1995, c. 78.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Executive order requiring face masks. —

Winery was not entitled to a temporary injunction from enforcement of an executive order requiring face coverings to be worn by individuals in certain settings, because the Governor of Virginia and the Virginia State Health Commissioner validly enacted the order to limit the spread of COVID-19 and expressly waived the application of the criminal prohibition on the wearing of a mask to conceal one’s identity. The winery could not demonstrate a likely success as to the merits, irreparable harm, the balance of equities, and the public interest. Strother v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 233, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 106 (Fauquier County June 29, 2020).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality. —

Commonwealth has authority to promulgate regulations for facilities in which first trimester abortions are performed as well as for providers of first trimester abortions, so long as the regulations adhere to constitutional limitations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ralph K. Smith, Member, Senate of Virginia,
2010 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (8/20/10); Opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 10-012,
(8/20/10).

§ 32.1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this title unless the context requires otherwise or it is otherwise provided:

“Board”
or

“State Board”

means the State Board of Health.

“Commissioner”
means the State Health Commissioner.

“Department”
means the State Department of Health.

“Medical care facility”
means any institution, place, building, or agency, whether or not licensed or required to be licensed by the Board or the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, whether operated for profit or nonprofit, and whether privately owned or privately operated or owned or operated by a local governmental unit, (i) by or in which health services are furnished, conducted, operated, or offered for the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease, pain, injury, deformity, or physical condition, whether medical or surgical, of two or more nonrelated persons who are injured or physically sick or have mental illness, or for the care of two or more nonrelated persons requiring or receiving medical, surgical, nursing, acute, chronic, convalescent, or long-term care services, or services for individuals with disabilities, or (ii) which is the recipient of reimbursements from third-party health insurance programs or prepaid medical service plans.

The term “medical care facility” does not include any facility of (a) the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (b) any nonhospital substance abuse residential treatment program operated by or contracted primarily for the use of a community services board under the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services’ Comprehensive State Plan; (c) an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/IID) that has no more than 12 beds and is in an area identified as in need of residential services for individuals with intellectual disability in any plan of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (d) a physician’s office, except that portion of a physician’s office described in subdivision A 6 of §

32.1-102.1:3

; (e) the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services; (f) the Department of Corrections; or (g) the Department of Veterans Services.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, partnership, or association or any other legal entity.

History.

1979, c. 711; 2020, c. 1271.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 deleted the subdivision designations 1 through 4; added the definition of “Medical care facility” and in the definition of “Person,” inserted the first “or.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Medical care facility.” —

A freestanding emergency facility that is owned and operated by a licensed hospital is not required to be separately licensed unless it falls within one of the classifications of “hospital” set forth in regulations promulgated by the state Board of Health.
Additionally, the establishment of a freestanding emergency facility is not subject to the issuance of a certificate of public need unless it qualifies as a “medical care facility” under §

32.1-102.1

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable George L. Barker, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-045, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (3/8/19).

§ 32.1-3.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 32.1-4.
Sovereign immunity.

Nothing contained in this title shall be construed to be a waiver of the defense of sovereign immunity except where expressly provided by the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

1979, c. 711.